Utah statutes.
13-31-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "All rights and title" does not include rights or title in patents or copyrights.

(2)  "Customer" means a person that:

(a)  causes a molder to fabricate, cast, or otherwise make a mold; or

(b)  provides a molder with a mold to make a product for the customer.

(3)  "Make" includes to manufacture, assemble, cast, or fabricate.

(4)  "Mold" includes a die, form, or pattern.

(5) (a)  "Molder" means a person that makes or uses a mold for the purpose of making a product for a customer.

(b)  "Molder" includes a tool or die maker.

